Hawaii statutes.
[§321-22] Long term care service
development fund established. There is established in the treasury of the
State a special fund to be known as the long term care service development
fund, which shall be administered by the executive office on aging to provide
grants to promote the establishment, reorganization, or expansion of businesses
and nonprofit corporations offering community-based long term care services on
a fee-for-service basis and to provide funding for training and business plan
development, including, but not limited to, workshops assisting providers on
the development of their business plans, assistance with applications for
grants, business management training, and other types of training. [L 1989, c
380, §2]

Cross References

Coordination and development of caregiver support services,
see §349-15.

Long-term care, see chapter 346D.

Long-term care financing, see chapter 346C.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next